zh-CN: 拉链用途: 服装; 箱包; 演出服; 鞋履; 通用工艺品; 户外装备; 室内装潢和家居装饰; 其他
nb: Bruksområde for glidelåsen: Klær; Vesker og bagasje; Kostymer; Fottøy; Generelt håndarbeid; Friluftsutstyr; Møbeltrekk og interiør; Annet
ja: ファスナー用途: アパレル; バッグ・旅行鞄; コスチューム; フットウェア; 一般的なクラフト; アウトドアギア; 室内装飾・インテリア; その他
sk-SK: Aplikácia zipsu: Oblečenie; Tašky a batožina; Kostýmy; Obuv; Všeobecné ručné práce; Outdoorové vybavenie; Čalúnenie a bytové dekorácie; Iné
hu: Zipper alkalmazás: Ruházat; Táskák és poggyász; Jelmezkészítés; Lábbeli; Általános kézművesség; Szabadtéri felszerelés; Kárpitozás és lakberendezés; Egyéb
en: Zipper application: Apparel; Bags & luggage; Costuming; Footwear; General purpose crafts; Outdoor gear; Upholstery & home decor; Other
el: Εφαρμογή φερμουάρ: Ένδυση; Τσάντες και αποσκευές; Κοστούμια; Υπόδηση; Χειροτεχνίες γενικής χρήσης; Εξοπλισμός εξωτερικού χώρου; Ταπετσαρίες και διακόσμηση σπιτιού; Άλλο
tr: Fermuar kullanım amacı: Giyim; Çanta ve valiz; Kostüm; Ayakkabı; Genel amaçlı el işleri; Dış mekan ekipmanı; Döşeme ve ev dekorasyonu; Diğer
pt-BR: Zíper aplicação: Vestuário; Bolsas e malas; Fantasias; Calçados; Artesanato em geral; Equipamentos para atividades ao ar livre; Estofados e decoração para casa; Outros
sv: Användningsområde för dragkedja: Kläder; Väskor och bagage; Kostym och maskerad; Skor; Allmänt hantverk; Utomhusutrustning; Möbelklädsel och heminredning; Övrigt
sl-SI: Uporaba zadrge: Oblačila; Torbe in prtljaga; Kostumi; Obutev; Rokodelstvo; Oprema za na prostem; Oblazinjenje in oprema za dom; Drugo
nl: Toepassing van de rits: Kleding; Tassen en bagage; Kostuums; Schoenen; Algemene knutselwerken; Outdoor-uitrusting; Meubelstoffen en woondecoratie; Overig
pl: Zastosowanie zamka błyskawicznego: Odzież; Torby i bagaż; Kostiumy; Obuwie; Rękodzieło ogólnego przeznaczenia; Sprzęt outdoorowy; Tapicerka i dekoracje wnętrz; Inne
hr-HR: Aplikacija patentnog zatvarača: Odjeća; Torbe i prtljaga; Kostimografija; Obuća; Opća namjena i rukotvorine; Oprema za boravak u prirodi; Presvlake i uređenje doma; Ostalo
fr: Usage de la fermeture éclair: Vêtements; Sacs et bagages; Costumes; Chaussures; Artisanat à usage général; Équipement de plein air; Tapisserie et décoration intérieure; Autre
th: แอปพลิเคชั่นซิป: เครื่องแต่งกาย; กระเป๋าและกระเป๋าเดินทาง; คอสตูม; รองเท้า; งานฝีมืออเนกประสงค์; อุปกรณ์กลางแจ้ง; ผ้าบุเฟอร์นิเจอร์และของตกแต่งบ้าน; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 拉鍊應用: 服飾; 包袋與行李箱; 戲服; 鞋類; 一般工藝品; 戶外裝備; 室內裝飾與家居裝飾; 其他
ru: Применение молнии: Одежда; Сумки и багаж; Костюмы; Обувь; Рукоделие общего назначения; Снаряжение для активного отдыха; Обивка и домашний декор; Другое
ro-RO: Aplicația fermoarului: Îmbrăcăminte; Genți și bagaje; Costume; Încălțăminte; Artizanat de uz general; Echipament de exterior; Tapițerie și decorațiuni interioare; Altele
fi: Vetoketjun käyttökohde: Vaatteet; Laukut ja matkatavarat; Puvustus; Jalkineet; Yleiskäyttö ja askartelu; Ulkoiluvarusteet; Verhoilu ja sisustus; Muu
bg-BG: Приложение на ципа: Облекло; Чанти и багаж; Костюми; Обувки; Занаяти с общо предназначение; Екипировка за открито; Тапицерия и домашен декор; Други
lt-LT: Užtrauktuko paskirtis: Drabužiai; Krepšiai ir lagaminai; Kostiumai; Avalynė; Bendrosios paskirties rankdarbiai; Lauko įranga; Baldų apmušalai ir namų dekoras; Kita
ko: 지퍼 용도: 의류; 가방 및 러기지; 코스튬; 신발; 다목적 공예; 야외용 장비; 실내 장식 및 홈 데코; 기타
pt-PT: Aplicação do fecho de correr: Vestuário; Sacos e bagagem; Guarda-roupa; Calçado; Artesanato de uso geral; Equipamento de exterior; Estofos e decoração de interiores; Outro
cs: Použití zipu: Oděv; Tašky a zavazadla; Kostýmy; Obuv; Univerzální / ruční práce; Outdoorové vybavení; Čalounění a bytový dekor; Jiné
vi: Khóa kéo ứng dụng: Trang phục; Túi xách & hành lý; Trang phục biểu diễn; Giày dép; Thủ công đa dụng; Đồ dã ngoại; Bọc nội thất & trang trí nhà cửa; Khác
da: Anvendelse for lynlås: Beklædning; Tasker og bagage; Kostumer; Fodtøj; Generelt hobbybrug; Outdoor-udstyr; Polstring og boligindretning; Andet
es: Uso de la cremallera: Ropa; Bolsos y equipaje; Disfraces; Calzado; Manualidades de uso general; Equipamiento para exteriores; Tapicería y decoración del hogar; Otro
de: Verwendungszweck des Reißverschlusses: Bekleidung; Taschen & Gepäck; Kostüme; Schuhe; Allzweck-Bastelarbeiten; Outdoor-Ausrüstung; Polstermöbel & Wohnkultur; Sonstige
it: Applicazione della cerniera: Abbigliamento; Borse e valigeria; Costumi; Calzature; Bricolage generico; Attrezzatura outdoor; Tappezzeria e decorazioni per la casa; Altro